Wyoming, session 2026, HB0065.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-4-308(a) and by creating new
subsections (d) through (m) is amended to read:

HB0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0088
21-4-308. Disciplinary measures; required rules and
policies; duties of school district boards of trustees and
school district employees; reporting requirements.

(a) Each board of trustees in each school district
within the state may shall adopt rules or policies for
reasonable forms of punishment and disciplinary measures.
Subject to such rules, teachers, principals, and
superintendents in such discipline of students enrolled in
a school district. may impose reasonable forms of
punishment and disciplinary measures for insubordination,
disobedience, and other misconduct. The rules or policies
shall:

(i) Provide school district employees with
authority to enforce school and district behavior rules and
policies applicable to students placed under their
supervision by the school principal or the principal's
designated representative to ensure all students have the
opportunity to learn on school district property and ensure
the safety of students and school district personnel. The
rules or policies shall provide school district employees
HB0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0088
with authority to take any of the following actions to
ensure the safety of students and school district employees
and to maintain the opportunity for all students to learn:

(A) Enforce classroom management rules or
policies adopted pursuant to this subsection, including
policies or rules adopted for the use of cellular phones,
smart watches, tablets, computers and all other electronic
devices;

(B) Discuss behavior and disciplinary
issues regarding a student with the student's parent or
guardian. The school district may make exceptions to the
requirements of this subdivision necessary to comply with
any applicable state or federal laws;

(C) Enforce consequences in response to
student misconduct that violates the rules or policies
adopted pursuant to this section or a student code of
conduct adopted by a school district that may include any
of the following:

HB0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0088
(I) Removal of violent, abusive,
uncontrollable or disruptive students from the area of
disruption on school district property. Reasonable force
may be used by school district employees to remove a
student from the area of disruption on school district
property to prevent injury of the student or others or to
ensure the safety of students and school district
employees. Any use of reasonable force to remove a student
shall comply with rules governing seclusion and restraint
required pursuant to W.S. 21-2-202(a)(xxxii);

(II) Referral to the school principal
or school district superintendent for behavioral
modification or imposition of consequences pursuant to
subsection (d) of this section. If a student is removed
pursuant to subdivision (I) of this subparagraph, prior to
the imposition of any behavioral modification or
consequences pursuant to subsection (d) of this section,
the school principal or the school district superintendent
shall consult with the employee that removed the student to
discuss recommended consequences. If the final consequences
or punishments imposed by the school principal or the
HB0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0088
school district superintendent pursuant to subsection (d)
of this section differ from those recommended by the
employee that removed the student, written notice shall be
provided by the school district to the removing employee.
The employee shall also be informed of all actions taken to
address the student's behavior.

(ii) For purposes of this section, "school
district property" means any property owned or leased by a
school district, including classrooms, property where any
school district or school sponsored activities take place,
as defined by W.S. 21-3-137(a)(v), regardless of location,
and transportation to or from school sponsored activities.

(d) Consequences imposed under this section by the
school principal, the school district superintendent or the
board of trustees may include the following:

(i) If a student is removed from a classroom,
placement in an alternative classroom. No student removed
from a class shall be returned to the class from which the
HB0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0088
student was removed without the written consent of the
classroom teacher;

(ii) In-school suspension;

(iii) Exclusion from participation in, or
attendance at, school or district sponsored events and
activities, including extracurricular or cocurricular
activities;

(iv) Suspension or expulsion in accordance with
W.S. 21-4-305 and 21-4-306.

(e) School district employees that request assistance
in enforcement of actions authorized pursuant to paragraph
(a)(i) of this section shall receive assistance, as soon as
reasonably practical, from other school district personnel,
including the school principal.

(f) Each school district shall provide ongoing, high
quality and district-funded professional development to
ensure teachers and staff have the ability to provide
HB0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0088
students with a high quality, adequate education in
kindergarten through grade twelve (12). Each school
district shall ensure teachers and staff have input on the
design and implementation of the professional development
required pursuant to this subsection.

(g) Any school district employee who knows, or has
reasonable suspicion to believe, that a person has
committed, or may commit, a violent crime on school
property shall report the information to the school
principal and the school district superintendent. If the
report is made in good faith, the principal and
superintendent shall defend and support the actions of the
reporting employee.

(h) The school district board of trustees shall take
reasonable steps to ensure the safety of students and
school district employees when physical violence is likely
to occur on school district property.

(j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a
teacher who acts in a manner consistent with this section,
HB0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0088
applicable school district and board of trustees policies,
and rules of the state board of education shall not be
subject to professional disciplinary proceedings,
reprimand, or adverse employment actions.

(k) The school district superintendent or school
principal shall provide written notice to the student's
parent or guardian of any action taken under this section
and shall consult with and involve the student's parent or
guardian in the imposition of any consequence imposed
pursuant to this section.

(m) The following student discipline reports shall
maintain the confidentiality of individual students. All
data reported pursuant to this subsection shall be
de-identified and shall not include personally identifiable
student information:

(i) Not later than June 15 of each year, each
school shall report major student disciplinary actions
imposed in the preceding school year to the school district
board of trustees;
HB0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0088

(ii) Not later than July 15 of each year, the
board of trustees shall consolidate the information
submitted pursuant to paragraph (i) of this subsection and
submit the information to the department of education;

(iii) Not later than August 15 of each year, the
department of education shall submit a report to the joint
education interim committee summarizing the information
received pursuant to paragraph (ii) of this subsection.

Section 2. W.S. 21-4-308(b) is repealed.

Section 3. Not later than August 1, 2026, each school
district shall adopt policies or rules as required by W.S.
21-4-308(a) as amended by section 1 of this act.

HB0065

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0088
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0065